Georgia, session 2025_26, SB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-1-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
relative to crimes and offenses, is amended by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(8.1) 'Law enforcement officer' means:
(A) A peace officer;
(B) Any state or federal law enforcement personnel who render assistance to a law
enforcement agency of this state or any political subdivision thereof in response to a
declaration of a state of emergency or disaster issued by the Governor pursuant to Code
Section 38-3-51;
(C) An appointed chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit who
has not completed the applicable training required by Code Section 35-8-20
S. B. 99
- 1 -

LC 39 4596S (SCS)
or 35-8-20.1 from the date of initial appointment to the date by which such training is
to be completed pursuant to the applicable Code section; and
(D) A federal law enforcement officer who is employed by the United States
government as a full-time law enforcement officer, is in good standing with his or her
federal agency of employment, is authorized to carry a firearm in the performance of
his or her official duties, and is empowered to arrest a person for criminal violations of
the United States Code."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 99
- 2 -